Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 8 Modification and Termination of Conservatorship

29-5-70.
Proceedings when allegations that ward denied right or privilege.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may conduct a judicial inquiry into whether the ward is being denied a right or privilege provided for by this chapter and may issue appropriate orders. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the inquiry be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the conservator, the ward’s legal counsel, if any, and the ward’s guardian, if any. The court, in its discretion, may appoint legal counsel for the ward or a guardian ad litem, or both.

No petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied a right or privilege provided for by this chapter shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition alleging that the ward is being unjustly denied substantially the same right or privilege unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-71.
Modification of conservatorship; contents of petition for modification; burden of proof.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, the court may modify the conservatorship by adjusting the duties or powers of the conservator, as defined in Code Sections 29-5-22 and 29-5-23, or the powers of the ward, as defined in Code Sections 29-5-20 and 29-5-21, or by making other appropriate adjustments to reflect the extent of the current capacity of the ward or other circumstances of the conservatorship. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the petition be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the conservator, the ward’s legal counsel, if any, and the ward’s guardian, if any. In any proceeding under this Code section that would expand or increase the powers of the conservator or further restrict the rights of the ward, the court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward. In all other cases, the court, in its discretion, may appoint legal counsel for the ward or a guardian ad litem, or both.

If the petition for modification alleges a significant change in the capacity of the ward, it must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that there has been a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing, with such notice as the court deems appropriate.

If the petition for modification does not allege a significant change in the capacity of the ward, the court in its discretion may modify the conservatorship upon a showing that the modification is in the ward’s best interest; provided, however, that the court may order compliance with any of the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section prior to granting the petition for modification.

In any proceeding under this Code section that would expand or increase the powers of the conservator or further restrict the powers of the ward, the burden is on the petitioner to show by clear and convincing evidence that the modification is in the ward’s best interest. In any proceeding under this Code section that would restrict the powers of the conservator or restore powers to the ward, the burden is on the petitioner to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the modification is in the ward’s best interest.

No petition for modification shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition for substantially the same modification unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 2/SB 134.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “Code Sections” was substituted for “Code” near the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 2/SB 134, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 24-5-71 but actually amended Code Section 29-5-71.

29-5-72.
Termination of conservatorship; required evidence to support; burden of proof; death of ward.

Upon the petition of any interested person, including the ward, or upon the court’s own motion, and upon a proper showing that the need for a conservatorship has ended, the court may terminate the conservatorship and restore all personal and property rights to the ward. Except for good cause shown, the court shall order that notice of the petition be given, in whatever form the court deems appropriate, to the ward, the conservator, the ward’s legal counsel, and the ward’s guardian, if any. The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward and may, in its discretion, appoint a guardian ad litem.

A petition for termination must be supported either by the affidavits of two persons who have knowledge of the ward, one of whom may be the petitioner, or of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, setting forth the supporting facts and determinations. If, after reviewing the petition and the affidavits, the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the conservatorship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall order that an evaluation be conducted in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-11. If, after reviewing the evaluation report, the court finds that there is no probable cause to believe that the conservatorship should be terminated, the court shall dismiss the petition. If the petition is not dismissed, the court shall schedule a hearing with such notice as the court deems appropriate.

In any proceeding under this Code section the burden is on the petitioner to show by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no longer a need for the conservatorship.

No petition for termination of a conservatorship shall be allowed by the court within two years after the denial or dismissal on the merits of a petition for termination of the conservatorship unless the petitioner shows a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the ward.

The death of the ward automatically terminates the conservatorship except for purposes of the final settlement of the petition for letters of discharge, as provided in Code Section 29-5-81.

Upon termination of the conservatorship, the conservator shall deliver any money or property of the ward to the former ward or, if the ward is deceased, to the ward’s personal representative.

When a ward for whom the county administrator or county guardian has been previously appointed as conservator dies intestate, the conservator shall proceed to distribute the ward’s estate in the same manner as if the conservator had been appointed administrator of the estate. The sureties on the conservator’s bond shall be responsible for the conservator’s faithful administration and distribution of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 15/SB 534.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).